Hawaii statutes.
[§271G-18] Accounts, records, and reports.
The public utilities commission may require annual, periodical, or special
reports from all water carriers, prescribe the manner and form in which the
reports shall be made, and require from the carriers specific and full, true,
and correct answers to all questions upon which the commission may deem
information to be necessary. [L 1974, c 94, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next